North Carolina, session 2025, SB541.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Short Title. – This act shall be known as the "Train Infrastructure
Acceleration Act."
SECTION 1.(b) Purpose. – The purpose of this act is to recognize the significance
of the Corridor Identification Program routes submitted to the Federal Railroad Administration's
Corridor Identification and Development Program, to strengthen partnerships with federal
agencies, and to secure additional funding for both existing and new corridors. The Department
of Transportation shall expedite the implementation of these routes with the goal of enhancing
rail connectivity across North Carolina.
SECTION 1.(c) Allocation. – In accordance with the purpose of this act, each of the
following routes shall receive an additional State allocation of one million dollars ($1,000,000)
for comprehensive engineering, feasibility studies, and initial development efforts. These
additional funds shall be in addition to the funds already allocated for this purpose.
Route Name
Asheville to Salisbury.
Charlotte to Washington, D.C. (Southeast Corridor (SEC): Norlina Subdivision realignment of
the existing Carolinian).
Charlotte to Atlanta, Georgia (SEC: Greenfield alternative).
Charlotte to Kings Mountain.
Raleigh to Fayetteville.
Raleigh to Wilmington.
Raleigh to Winston-Salem.
SECTION 1.(d) Report. – No later than December 1 of each year, the Department
shall submit an annual report on the implementation of this act to the Joint Legislative
Transportation Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall detail
the utilization of funds, advancements in engineering and feasibility studies, and any secured
federal funding.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Transportation the sum of seven million dollars ($7,000,000) in nonrecurring funds.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S541-v-1*